Utah statutes.
39-1-5.   Governor may call guard into active service -- Authority.
(1)  The governor may order into active service the National Guard or the
unorganized militia or portions of either as he finds necessary.
(2)  If it is necessary to order into active service any members of the
unorganized militia, the governor may adopt methods he finds most expedient
for that purpose, and may prescribe and enforce uniform rules for the conduct
of drafts, appoint all officers necessary, and fix the amount of their pay,
not to exceed the rate of pay prescribed for the National Guard.
